Georgia, session 2025_26, HB267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 1 -

25 LC 49 2282S
16 PART I
17 SECTION 1-1.
18 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Riley Gaines Act."
19 PART II
20 SECTION 2-1.
21 Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to education, is amended in Part
22 3 of Article 16 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating
23 to the health of elementary and secondary school students, by adding a new Code section to
24 read as follows:
25 "20-2-771.3.
26 (a) As used in this Code section, the term:
27 (1) 'Athletic event' means any interscholastic or intramural contest, game, jamboree,
28 scrimmage, tournament, showcase, combine, or tryout related to a sport or physical
29 activity.
30 (2) 'Female' means an individual who has, had, or will have the reproductive system
31 capable of the generation, migration, and utilization of eggs for fertilization, or would
32 have such capabilities but for a developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident.
33 (3) 'Male' means an individual who has, had, or will have the reproductive system
34 capable of the generation, migration, and utilization of sperm for fertilization, or would
35 have such capabilities but for a developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident.
36 (4) 'Multiple occupancy restroom or changing area' means an area in a public school or
37 local school system building that is designed or designated for use by student athletes
38 during athletic events, to be used by one or more individuals at the same time, and in
39 which one or more individuals may be in various stages of undress in the presence of
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 2 -

25 LC 49 2282S
40 other individuals. Such term includes, but shall not be limited to, the following during
41 athletic events:
42 (A) Restrooms;
43 (B) Locker rooms;
44 (C) Changing rooms; and
45 (D) Shower rooms.
46 (5) 'Sex' means an individual's biological sex, either male or female. An individual's sex
47 can be observed or clinically verified at or before birth and in no case is an individual's
48 sex determined by stipulation or self-identification.
49 (b) To ensure the privacy and safety of students, each public school or local school system
50 in this state shall:
51 (1) Require each multiple occupancy restroom or changing area to be designated as
52 follows:
53 (A) For the exclusive use by individuals whose sex is male; or
54 (B) For the exclusive use by individuals whose sex is female; and
55 (2)(A) Provide a reasonable accommodation to an individual who is unwilling or
56 unable to use a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area designated for such
57 individual's sex.
58 (B)(i) A reasonable accommodation under this paragraph shall include, but shall not
59 be limited to, allowing such individual to access a single-occupancy restroom or
60 changing area.
61 (ii) A reasonable accommodation under this paragraph shall not include allowing
62 such individual to access a restroom or changing area that is designated for use by
63 members of the opposite sex while members of the sex opposite to such individual are
64 present or may be present in the restroom or changing area.
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 3 -

25 LC 49 2282S
65 (c) This Code section shall not be construed or applied to prohibit an individual from
66 entering a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area designated for use by individuals
67 of the opposite sex when he or she enters such area for one of the following reasons:
68 (1) For authorized custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes;
69 (2) To render emergency medical assistance;
70 (3) To address an ongoing emergency, including, but not limited to, a physical
71 altercation;
72 (4) A minor child is accompanied by his or her parent or legal guardian who deems such
73 entry necessary for the child's safety, welfare, or assistance; or
74 (5) The performance of official duties and responsibilities as authorized coaches and
75 trainers for purposes directly related to the athletic event.
76 (d) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed or applied to prohibit a public school
77 or local school system from adopting a policy that is necessary to accommodate individuals
78 protected under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C.
79 Section 12101 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025, or young children who are in need
80 of physical assistance when using a restroom or changing facility that is located in a public
81 school or local school system; provided, however, that such policy shall not be contrary to
82 or inconsistent with the provisions of subsections (a) through (c) of this Code section.
83 (e)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a public school or local
84 school system that sponsors or supervises an overnight trip in conjunction with an athletic
85 event involving public school students shall ensure that a public school student attending
86 the overnight trip either:
87 (A) Shares sleeping quarters with a member or, if necessary, multiple members, of the
88 same sex; or
89 (B) Is provided single-occupancy sleeping quarters.
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 4 -

25 LC 49 2282S
90 (2) A public school student attending an overnight trip in conjunction with an athletic
91 event may share sleeping quarters with a member of the opposite sex if the member of
92 the opposite sex is a member of such student's immediate family.
93 (f)(1) The Professional Standards Commission shall be authorized as provided in
94 subsection (a) of Code Section 20-2-984.3 to investigate complaints alleging
95 noncompliance with this Code section.
96 (2) Upon a finding of noncompliance with this Code section by the Professional
97 Standards Commission, such noncompliant individual shall be subject to sanctions as
98 determined by the Professional Standards Commission, as provided for in Code
99 Section 20-2-984.5.
100 (g) A parent or legal guardian of a public school student shall have a cause of action
101 against a public school or local school system if:
102 (1) Such student:
103 (A) Encounters a member of the opposite sex in a multiple occupancy restroom or
104 changing area that is designated for individuals whose sex is the same as such student's
105 sex if such member of the opposite sex received permission or direction from an
106 official, employee, or agent of a public school or local school system to use such
107 multiple occupancy restroom or changing area, except as provided in subsection (c) of
108 this Code section; or
109 (B) Is required by an official, employee, or agent of a public school or local school
110 system to share sleeping quarters with a member of the opposite sex who is not a family
111 member of such student; or
112 (2) An official, employee, or agent of a public school or local school system is found to
113 be noncompliant under subsection (f) of this Code section arising out of or related to an
114 incident involving such student.
115 (h) The State Board of Education and the Professional Standards Commission shall
116 promulgate rules and regulations to implement this Code section."
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 5 -

25 LC 49 2282S
117 SECTION 2-2.
118 Said title is further amended in Article 1 of Chapter 3, relating to postsecondary education
119 generally, by adding a new part to read as follows:
120 "Part 3
121 20-3-15.
122 As used in this part, the term:
123 (1) 'Athletic event' means any intercollegiate or intramural contest, game, jamboree,
124 scrimmage, tournament, showcase, combine, or tryout related to a sport or physical
125 activity.
126 (2) 'Female' means an individual who has, had, or will have the reproductive system
127 capable of the generation, migration, and utilization of eggs for fertilization, or would
128 have such capabilities but for a developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident.
129 (3) 'Male' means an individual who has, had, or will have the reproductive system
130 capable of the generation, migration, and utilization of sperm for fertilization, or would
131 have such capabilities but for a developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident.
132 (4) 'Multiple occupancy restroom or changing area' means an area in a building that is
133 owned, occupied, or leased by a postsecondary education institution that is designed or
134 designated for use by student athletes during athletic events, to be used by one or more
135 individuals at the same time, and in which one or more individuals may be in various
136 stages of undress in the presence of other individuals. Such term includes, but shall not
137 be limited to, the following during athletic events:
138 (A) Restrooms;
139 (B) Locker rooms;
140 (C) Changing rooms; and
141 (D) Shower rooms.
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 6 -

25 LC 49 2282S
142 (5) 'Postsecondary education institution' means a school which is:
143 (A) An institution of the University System of Georgia;
144 (B) A unit of the Technical College System of Georgia; or
145 (C) A private postsecondary institution eligible for tuition equalization grants in
146 accordance with the provisions of Code Section 20-3-411.
147 (6) 'Sex' means an individual's biological sex, either male or female. An individual's sex
148 can be observed or clinically verified at or before birth and in no case is an individual's
149 sex determined by stipulation or self-identification.
150 20-3-16.
151 (a) To ensure the privacy and safety of students, each postsecondary education institution
152 in this state shall:
153 (1) Require each multiple occupancy restroom or changing area to be designated as
154 follows:
155 (A) For the exclusive use by individuals whose sex is male; or
156 (B) For the exclusive use by individuals whose sex is female; and
157 (2)(A) Provide a reasonable accommodation to an individual who is unwilling or
158 unable to use a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area designated for such
159 individual's sex.
160 (B)(i) A reasonable accommodation under this paragraph shall include, but shall not
161 be limited to, allowing such individual to access a single-occupancy restroom or
162 changing area.
163 (ii) A reasonable accommodation under this paragraph shall not include allowing
164 such individual to access a restroom or changing area that is designated for use by
165 members of the opposite sex while members of the sex opposite to such individual are
166 present or may be present in the restroom or changing area.
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 7 -

25 LC 49 2282S
167 (b) This Code section shall not be construed or applied to prohibit an individual from
168 entering a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area designated for use by individuals
169 of the opposite sex when he or she enters such area for one of the following reasons:
170 (1) For authorized custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes;
171 (2) To render emergency medical assistance;
172 (3) To address an ongoing emergency, including, but not limited to, a physical
173 altercation;
174 (4) A minor child is accompanied by his or her parent or legal guardian who deems such
175 entry necessary for the child's safety, welfare, or assistance; or
176 (5) The performance of official duties and responsibilities as authorized coaches and
177 trainers for purposes directly related to the athletic event.
178 (c) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed or applied to prohibit a postsecondary
179 education institution from adopting a policy that is necessary to accommodate individuals
180 protected under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C.
181 Section 12101 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025, or young children who are in need
182 of physical assistance when using a restroom or changing facility that is located in a
183 building owned, occupied, or leased by a postsecondary education institution; provided,
184 however, that such policy shall not be contrary to or inconsistent with the provisions of
185 subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section.
186 (d)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a postsecondary education
187 institution that sponsors or supervises an overnight trip in conjunction with an athletic
188 event involving students shall ensure that a student attending the overnight trip either:
189 (A) Shares sleeping quarters with a member or, if necessary, multiple members, of the
190 same sex; or
191 (B) Is provided single-occupancy sleeping quarters.
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 8 -

25 LC 49 2282S
192 (2) A student attending an overnight trip in conjunction with an athletic event may share
193 sleeping quarters with a member of the opposite sex if the member of the opposite sex is
194 a member of such student's immediate family.
195 (e) A student or the parent or legal guardian of a student who has not reached the age of
196 majority shall have a cause of action against a postsecondary education institution if such
197 student:
198 (1) Encounters a member of the opposite sex in a multiple occupancy restroom or
199 changing area that is designated for individuals whose sex is the same as such student's
200 sex, except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section; or
201 (2) Is required to share sleeping quarters with a member of the opposite sex who is not
202 a family member of such student.
203 (f) The Board of Regents and the State Board of the Technical College System of Georgia
204 shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement this Code section as applicable to the
205 University System of Georgia and the Technical College System of Georgia, respectively."
206 PART III
207 SECTION 3-1.
208 Said title is further amended in Chapter 1, relating to general provisions of education, by
209 adding a new article to read as follows:
210 "ARTICLE 5
211 20-1-50.
212 As used in this article, the term:
213 (1) 'Athletic association' means any governing body for athletic competition or sport or
214 any organization of athletic conferences.
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 9 -

25 LC 49 2282S
215 (2) 'Athletic event' means any contest, game, jamboree, scrimmage, tournament,
216 showcase, combine, or tryout related to a sport or physical activity.
217 (3) 'Competition' means an athletic event after which any team or individual is
218 designated as a winner, roster spots are determined, or prizes are awarded.
219 (4) 'Female' means an individual who has, had, or will have the reproductive system
220 capable of the generation, migration, and utilization of eggs for fertilization, or would
221 have such capabilities but for a developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident.
222 (5) 'Male' means an individual who has, had, or will have the reproductive system
223 capable of the generation, migration, and utilization of sperm for fertilization, or would
224 have such capabilities but for a developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident.
225 (6) 'Participant' means a student who is participating in an athletic event.
226 (7) 'Sex' means an individual's biological sex, either male or female. An individual's sex
227 can be observed or clinically verified at or before birth and in no case is an individual's
228 sex determined by stipulation or self-identification.
229 (8) 'Team' means any individual or group of people who compete in athletic events for
230 the same organization, school, club, college, university, or cause.
231 20-1-51.
232 Any public school, local school system, or postsecondary education institution that offers,
233 operates, or sponsors interscholastic or intercollegiate athletics shall provide equal athletic
234 opportunities for members of both sexes.
235 20-1-52.
236 Notwithstanding the requirements of Code Section 20-1-51, a public school, local school
237 system, or postsecondary education institution located in Georgia may operate or sponsor
238 single-sex teams where selection for such teams is based upon competitive skill or the
239 activity involved is a contact sport.
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 10 -

25 LC 49 2282S
240 20-1-53.
241 All public schools, local school systems, and postsecondary education institutions that are
242 participating in competitions or athletic events with or against public schools, local school
243 systems, or postsecondary education institutions must designate each team, competition,
244 or athletic event as:
245 (1) For males, men, or boys;
246 (2) For females, women, or girls; or
247 (3) Coeducational or mixed sex.
248 20-1-54.
249 (a) No public school, local school system, postsecondary education institution, or athletic
250 association that is participating in a competition or athletic event with or against a public
251 school, local school system, or postsecondary education institution that operates, sponsors,
252 or permits athletic events or competitions may allow any male to compete for, against, or
253 with a team designated for females, women, or girls.
254 (b) A public school, local school system, postsecondary education institution, or athletic
255 association that operates, sponsors, or permits athletic events or competitions may not:
256 (1) Allow any male to occupy a roster spot on any team designated for females, women,
257 or girls; or
258 (2) Allow any male to receive a scholarship designated for female athletes.
259 (c) The biological sex listed on a participant's birth certificate may be relied on to establish
260 the participant's eligibility under this Code section if the sex designated on the birth
261 certificate was designated at or near the time of the participant's birth.
262 (d) Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize a public school, local school
263 system, postsecondary education institution, or athletic association to verify or confirm a
264 student's sex through visual inspection of such student's external sex organs for purposes
265 of participation in athletic events; provided, however, that this subsection shall not prohibit
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 11 -

25 LC 49 2282S
266 reliance on medical records or other standard school medical procedures for such
267 verification.
268 20-1-55.
269 Nothing in this article shall prohibit a public school, local school system, postsecondary
270 education institution, or athletic association from allowing males to practice or train with
271 teams designated for females, women, or girls, so long as no such male player takes a roster
272 spot, opportunity to compete, scholarship, or spot at the school from any female.
273 20-1-56.
274 No governmental entity, licensing or accrediting organization, athletic association, public
275 school, or local school system may consider a complaint, open an investigation, or take
276 adverse action against a public school or local school system for complying with this
277 article.
278 20-1-57.
279 (a) Any individual who is deprived of an athletic opportunity or who suffers or who will
280 suffer direct or indirect harm resulting from a violation of this article may bring a private
281 cause of action for injunctive relief, compensatory damages, and attorney's fees against the
282 violating entity.
283 (b) Any public school, local school system, or athletic association that suffers or will suffer
284 direct or indirect harm as a result of a violation of this statute may bring a private cause of
285 action against the violating entity for injunctive relief and compensatory damages.
286 (c) Any individual or team subjected to retaliation or other adverse action as a result of
287 reporting a violation of this statute to an employee or representative of a public school,
288 local school system, postsecondary education institution, or athletic association or
289 subjected to retaliation or other adverse action as a result of reporting a violation of this
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 12 -

25 LC 49 2282S
290 article to the state or federal government entity with oversight authority, may bring a
291 private cause of action against the retaliating entity for injunctive relief, damages, and any
292 other relief available under law.
293 (d) An action brought under this Code section must be commenced within one year of the
294 event giving rise to the complaint."
295 PART IV
296 SECTION 4-1.
297 Title 1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general provisions, is amended
298 in Chapter 2, relating to persons and their rights, by adding a new Code section to read as
299 follows:
300 "1-2-7.1.
301 (a) The General Assembly finds the following with respect to the application of an
302 individual's sex pursuant to any state law or rules and regulations:
303 (1) The term 'sex' refers to an individual's biological sex, either male or female. An
304 individual's sex can be observed or clinically verified at or before birth and in no case is
305 an individual's sex determined by stipulation or self-identification;
306 (2) With respect to sex, the term 'equal' does not mean same or identical;
307 (3) With respect to sex, separate accommodations are not inherently unequal;
308 (4) An individual born with a medically verifiable diagnosis of disorder or differences
309 in sex development shall be provided any available legal protections and
310 accommodations afforded under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990,
311 42 U.S.C. Section 12101 et seq., and any applicable state law;
312 (5) Laws, rules, and regulations that distinguish between the sexes are subject to
313 intermediate constitutional scrutiny. Intermediate constitutional scrutiny forbids unfair
314 discrimination against similarly situated male and female individuals but allows the law
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 13 -

25 LC 49 2282S
315 to distinguish between the sexes where such distinctions are substantially related to
316 important governmental objections; and
317 (6) Notwithstanding any provision of state law to the contrary, distinctions between the
318 sexes with respect to athletics, living facilities, locker rooms, domestic violence shelters,
319 rape crisis centers, restrooms, and other areas where biology, safety, or privacy are
320 implicated that result in separate accommodations are substantially related to the
321 important governmental objections of protecting the health, safety, and privacy of
322 individuals in such circumstances.
323 (b) Any local school system, public school, or any state agency, department, or political
324 subdivision that collects vital statistics for the purpose of complying with
325 antidiscrimination laws or for the purpose of gathering accurate public health, crime,
326 economic, or other data shall identify each individual who is part of the collected data set
327 as either male or female at birth."
328 SECTION 4-2.
329 Said title is further amended in Code Section 1-3-1, relating to construction of statutes
330 generally, by revising paragraphs (4) through (6) of subsection (d) as follows:
331 "(4) Gender. The masculine gender includes the feminine and the neuter.
332 (5)(4) Joint authority. A joint authority given to any number of persons or officers may
333 be executed by a majority of them, unless it is otherwise declared.
334 (6)(5) Number. The singular or plural number each includes the other, unless the other
335 is expressly excluded.
336 (6) Sex. Masculine words shall include the feminine and neuter."
337 SECTION 4-3.
338 Said title is further amended in Chapter 3, relating to laws and statutes, in Code
339 Section 1-3-3, relating to definitions, by adding multiple new paragraphs to read as follows:
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 14 -

25 LC 49 2282S
340 "(7.2) 'Father' means a parent of the male sex.
341 (7.3) 'Female' means an individual who has, had, or will have the reproductive system
342 capable of the generation, migration, and utilization of eggs for fertilization, or would
343 have such capabilities but for a developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident."
344 "(9.1) 'Male' means an individual who has, had, or will have the reproductive system
345 capable of the generation, migration, and utilization of sperm for fertilization, or would
346 have such capabilities but for a developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident.
347 (9.2) 'Man' means, except when used as a generic reference to human beings, an adult
348 human male."
349 "(11.1) 'Mother' means a parent of the female sex."
350 "(22.1) 'Woman' means a human female."
351 PART V
352 SECTION 5-1.
353 Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to courts, is amended in Code
354 Section 15-9-90, relating to forms for probate court and local alteration, by revising
355 subsection (b) as follows:
356 "(b) The rules adopted pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall provide that the
357 forms so adopted may be altered locally in a particular petition or proceeding in such items
358 as grammar, gender usage sex terminology, the use of singular and plural nouns and
359 pronouns, the omission of optional or alternate language, the inclusion of variable
360 information such as names and addresses, and other nonmaterial ways."
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 15 -

25 LC 49 2282S
361 SECTION 5-2.
362 Title 17 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to criminal procedure, is
363 amended in Code Section 17-4-20.2, relating to bias crime report, requirements, use of
364 reports, and publication, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
365 "(a) Whenever a law enforcement officer investigates an incident of a crime in which it
366 appears there is reasonable suspicion to believe that the defendant intentionally selected
367 any victim or group of victims or any property as the object of the offense because of such
368 victim's or group of victims' actual or perceived race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
369 sexual orientation, gender, mental disability, or physical disability, whether or not an arrest
370 is made, the officer shall prepare and submit to the law enforcement officer's supervisor or
371 other designated person a written report of the incident entitled 'Bias Crime Report.' Forms
372 for such reports shall be designed and provided by the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.
373 The report shall include:
374 (1) Names of the parties;
375 (2) Relationship of the parties;
376 (3) Sex and gender of the parties;
377 (4) Race of the parties;
378 (5) Religion of the parties;
379 (6) Dates of birth of the parties;
380 (7) Time, place, and date of the incident;
381 (8) Whether there is evidence to indicate that the incident occurred because of a person's
382 actual or perceived attributes as specified by subsection (a) of this Code section;
383 (9) Type and extent of the alleged violation;
384 (10) Existence of any objects or symbols associated with the terrorizing of persons based
385 upon actual or perceived race, religion, or sex;
386 (11) Number and types of weapons involved, if any;
387 (12) Existence of any prior difficulties between the parties;
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 16 -

25 LC 49 2282S
388 (13) Type of police action taken in disposition of case;
389 (14) Whether the victim was apprised of available remedies and services; and
390 (15) Any other information the officer deems pertinent."
391 SECTION 5-3.
392 Said title is further amended in Code Section 17-10-17, relating to sentencing of defendants
393 guilty of crimes involving bias or prejudice and identification of increased sentence, by
394 revising subsection (b) as follows:
395 "(b) Subject to the notice requirement provided in Code Section 17-10-18 and in
396 enhancement of the penalty imposed, if the trier of fact determines beyond a reasonable
397 doubt that the defendant intentionally selected any victim or group of victims or any
398 property as the object of the offense because of such victim's or group of victims' actual or
399 perceived race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender, mental
400 disability, or physical disability, the judge imposing sentence shall:
401 (1) If the offense for which the defendant was convicted is a designated misdemeanor,
402 impose a sentence of imprisonment for a period of not less than six nor more than 12
403 months, and a fine not to exceed $5,000.00; or
404 (2) If the offense for which the defendant was convicted is a felony, impose a sentence
405 of imprisonment for a period of not less than two years, and a fine not to exceed
406 $5,000.00."
407 SECTION 5-4.
408 Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to education, is amended in
409 Code Section 20-2-315, relating to gender discrimination prohibited, authorized separate
410 gender teams, equal athletic opportunity, physical education classes, employee designated
411 to monitor compliance, grievance procedures, and reporting requirements, by revising
412 subsections (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (j) as follows:
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 17 -

25 LC 49 2282S
413 "(a) No student shall, on the basis of gender sex, be excluded from participation in, be
414 denied the benefits of, be treated differently from another student, or otherwise be
415 discriminated against in any interscholastic or intramural athletics offered by a local school
416 system, and no local school system shall provide any such athletics separately on such
417 basis.
418 (b) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section, a local school
419 system may operate or sponsor separate teams for members of each gender sex where
420 selection for such teams is based upon competitive skill or the activity involved is a contact
421 sport. However, where a local school system operates or sponsors a team in a particular
422 sport for members of one gender sex but operates or sponsors no such team for members
423 of the other gender sex, and athletic opportunities for members of that gender sex in that
424 particular sport have previously been limited, members of the excluded gender sex must
425 be allowed to try out for the team offered unless the sport involved is a contact sport.
426 Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the authority of a local school system
427 to operate or sponsor a single team for a contact sport that includes members of both
428 genders sexes. As used in this subsection, the term 'contact sport' includes boxing,
429 wrestling, rugby, ice hockey, football, basketball, and any other sport the purpose or major
430 activity of which involves bodily contact.
431 (c) A local school system which operates or sponsors interscholastic or intramural athletics
432 shall undertake all reasonable efforts to provide equal athletic opportunity for members of
433 both genders sexes. In determining whether equal opportunities are available the following
434 factors shall be considered:
435 (1) Whether the selection of sports and levels of competition effectively accommodate
436 the interests and abilities of members of both genders sexes;
437 (2) The provision of equipment and supplies;
438 (3) Scheduling of games and practice time;
439 (4) Travel allowance;
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 18 -

25 LC 49 2282S
440 (5) Opportunity to receive coaching and academic tutoring;
441 (6) Assignment and compensation of coaches and tutors;
442 (7) Provision of locker rooms and practice and competitive facilities;
443 (8) Provision of medical and training facilities and services; and
444 (9) Publicity.
445 Unequal aggregate expenditures for members of each gender sex or unequal expenditures
446 for male and female teams if a local school system operates or sponsors separate teams will
447 not constitute noncompliance with this subsection, but the failure to provide essential funds
448 for the basic operations of teams for one gender sex may be considered in assessing
449 equality of opportunity for members of each gender sex. Nothing in Code Section
450 20-2-411 shall be construed to limit the authority of a local school system to expend school
451 tax funds as authorized by Article VIII, Section VI, Paragraph I(b) of the Constitution in
452 order to comply with the requirements of this Code section.
453 (d) A local school system may provide separate toilet, locker room, and shower facilities
454 on the basis of gender sex, but such facilities shall be comparable to such facilities
455 provided for students of the other gender sex.
456 (e) This Code section does not prohibit the grouping of students in physical education
457 classes by gender sex."
458 "(j) The Department of Education may publish an annual report of local school systems
459 to include information regarding expenditures and participation rates for each gender sex
460 and such other information as the state board and department deem relevant."
461 SECTION 5-5.
462 Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to motor vehicles and traffic, is
463 amended in Code Section 40-5-25, relating to applications, fees, provisions for voluntary
464 participation in various programs, by revising subsection (d) as follows:
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 19 -

25 LC 49 2282S
465 "(d)(1) The General Assembly finds that it is in the best interest of this state to encourage
466 improved public education and awareness regarding anatomical gifts of human organs
467 and tissues and to address the ever increasing need for donations of anatomical gifts for
468 the benefit of the citizens of Georgia.
469 (2) The department shall make available to procurement organizations or secure data
470 centers maintained and managed at the direction of a procurement organization
471 information provided for in Article 6 of Chapter 5 of Title 44, the 'Georgia Revised
472 Uniform Anatomical Gift Act,' including the name, license number, date of birth, gender
473 sex, and most recent address of any person eligible pursuant to Code Section 44-5-142
474 who obtains an organ donor driver's license; provided, however, that the gender
475 information sex category information of either male or female shall be made available
476 only to a procurement organization or secure data center if such organization or center
477 has sufficient funds to cover the associated costs of providing such information.
478 Information so obtained by such organizations and centers shall be used for a state-wide
479 organ donor registry accessible to organ tissue and eye banks authorized to function as
480 such in this state and shall not be further disseminated."
481 SECTION 5-6.
482 Said title is further amended in Code Section 40-5-100, relating to personal identification
483 cards, contents, possession of more than one card prohibited, and optional contributions to
484 and participation in voluntary programs, by revising paragraph (2) of subsection (e) as
485 follows:
486 "(2) The department shall make available to procurement organizations or secure data
487 centers maintained and managed at the direction of a procurement organization
488 information provided for in Article 6 of Chapter 5 of Title 44, the 'Georgia Revised
489 Uniform Anatomical Gift Act,' including the name, identification card number, date of
490 birth, gender sex, and most recent address of any person who obtains an organ donor
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 20 -

25 LC 49 2282S
491 identification card; provided, however, that the gender information with respect to one's
492 sex shall be made available only to a procurement organization or secure data center if
493 such organization or center has sufficient funds to cover the associated costs of providing
494 such information. Information so obtained by such organizations and centers shall be
495 used for a state-wide organ donor registry accessible to organ tissue and eye banks
496 authorized to function as such in this state and shall not be further disseminated."
497 SECTION 5-7.
498 Title 44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to property, is amended in Code
499 Section 44-5-158, relating to donor registry, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
500 "(a) The Department of Driver Services shall make available to procurement organizations
501 or secure data centers maintained and managed at the direction of a procurement
502 organization the name, license number, date of birth, gender sex, and most recent address
503 of any person who obtains an organ donor's license; provided, however, that the gender
504 information with respect to one's sex shall only be made available to a procurement
505 organization or secure data center if such organization or center has sufficient funds to
506 cover the associated costs with providing such information. Information so obtained by
507 such organizations shall be used for the purpose of establishing a state-wide organ donor
508 registry accessible to organ tissue and eye banks authorized to function as such in this state
509 and shall not be further disseminated."
510 SECTION 5-8.
511 Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to social services, is amended
512 in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of Title 49, relating to children and youth services, by revising Code
513 Section 49-5-22, relating to voluntary pre-kindergarten programs to provide toilet facilities
514 screened for privacy, as follows:
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 21 -

25 LC 49 2282S
515 "49-5-22.
516 (a) The General Assembly finds that just as gender separated toileting separated by one's
517 sex among nonrelatives is the norm among adults, children should be allowed the same
518 opportunity to practice modesty when independent toileting behavior is well established
519 among the majority of their age group. Standardized adherence to this policy would
520 provide privacy, injury control, and sanitation.
521 (b) Each public or private voluntary pre-kindergarten program in this state which receives
522 state funding shall provide toilet facilities for the four-year-old pre-kindergarten age
523 children which it serves which are suitably screened for privacy. Nothing contained in this
524 Code section shall be construed to require a pre-kindergarten program to provide separately
525 constructed toilet facilities.
526 (c) The provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section shall not apply to any voluntary
527 pre-kindergarten program which provides separate and gender-specific male and female
528 toilet facilities for the children which it serves."
529 SECTION 5-9.
530 Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state government, is amended
531 in Code Section 50-12-22, relating to membership, appointment, terms, chairperson, and
532 meetings, by revising paragraph (2) of subsection (b) as follows:
533 "(2) The council should be a balanced representation of the entire state, accounting for,
534 but not limited to, minority and ethnic groups, gender male and female diversity,
535 geographic diversity, large and small organizations, and the public and private sectors;"
536 SECTION 5-10.
537 Various titles of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated are amended by replacing "gender"
538 with "sex" wherever the former term appears in:
539 (1) Code Section 11-1-106, relating to use of singular and plural and gender;
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 22 -

25 LC 49 2282S
540 (2) Code Section 12-5-287, relating to leasing of state owned marshland or water bottoms;
541 (3) Code Section 13-10-91, relating to verification of new employee eligibility,
542 applicability, and rules and regulations;
543 (4) Code Section 15-11-341, relating to written report to court and review hearing and
544 findings;
545 (5) Code Section 15-12-1, relating to definitions;
546 (6) Code Section 15-12-40.1, relating to state-wide master jury list, driver's license
547 information, list of registered voters, and random list of persons to comprise venire;
548 (7) Code Section 16-12-214, relating to study on minority and women participation;
549 addressing discrimination;
550 (8) Code Section 16-13-59, relating to information to include for each Schedule II, III, IV,
551 or V controlled substance prescription and compliance;
552 (9) Code Section 19-13-30, relating to State Commission on Family Violence;
553 (10) Code Section 20-2-315, relating to gender discrimination prohibited, authorized
554 separate gender teams, equal athletic opportunity, physical education classes, employee
555 designated to monitor compliance, grievance procedures, and reporting requirements;
556 (11) Code Section 20-2-316, relating to involvement of athletic association in high school
557 athletics;
558 (12) Code Section 20-2-740, relating to annual report by local boards of education
559 regarding disciplinary and placement actions and annual study by the Department of
560 Education;
561 (13) Code Section 20-3-681, relating to compensation of athlete for use of name, image,
562 or likeness, scholarships are not compensation, and requirements for schools and athletes;
563 (14) Code Section 26-4-83, relating to patient record systems;
564 (15) Code Section 27-2-2, relating to issuance and sale of hunting, fishing and trapping
565 licenses, identification required, withdrawal of agents' authority to sell licenses, online
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 23 -

25 LC 49 2282S
566 licensing system to allow making of anatomical gifts, and anatomical gift education and
567 awareness;
568 (16) Code Section 31-10-33, relating to procedure for stillbirth;
569 (17) Code Section 33-20C-4, relating to information and searchable format for directories
570 and exclusion of dental plans;
571 (18) Code Section 33-24-59.7, relating to coverage for the treatment of morbidly obese
572 patients, short title, legislative findings, and adoption of rules and regulations by the
573 Commissioner;
574 (19) Code Section 33-24-91, relating to use of credit information to underwrite or rate
575 risks;
576 (20) Code Section 33-30A-4, relating to membership, cooperative's powers, duties and
577 responsibilities, fees, and annual reports;
578 (21) Code Section 35-3-161, relating to time and procedure for withdrawal of blood
579 samples;
580 (22) Code Section 37-2-5, relating to regional advisory councils - establishing policy and
581 direction for disability services, membership, bylaws, meetings, and expenses;
582 (23) Code Section 37-2-6, relating to community mental health, developmental disabilities,
583 and addictive diseases service boards - community service board creation, membership,
584 participation of counties, transfer of powers and duties, alternate method of establishment,
585 bylaws, and reprisals prohibited;
586 (24) Code Section 37-2-11, relating to allocation of available funds for services, recipients
587 to meet minimum standards, accounting for fees generated by providers, and discrimination
588 in providing services prohibited;
589 (25) Code Section 40-5-2, relating to keeping of records of applications for licenses and
590 information on licenses and furnishing of information;
591 (26) Code Section 43-11-11, relating to gathering of census data on practicing dentists and
592 dental hygienists and standard form;
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 24 -

25 LC 49 2282S
593 (27) Code Section 43-18-46, relating to grounds for denial or revocation of license or
594 registration and other discipline;
595 (28) Code Section 49-3-2, relating to appointment of county board members, terms,
596 vacancies, per diem and expenses, and role of county board;
597 (29) Code Section 49-3-3.1, relating to annual report from county director of department
598 of family and children services and personal appearance;
599 (30) Code Section 49-5-281, relating to bill of rights for foster parents and filing of
600 grievance for violations;
601 (31) Code Section 49-10-1, relating to the Board of Health Care Workforce, composition,
602 expense allowances, staffing, and advisory committees;
603 (32) Code Section 50-18-72, relating to when public disclosure is not required;
604 (33) Code Section 50-36-1, relating to verification requirements, procedures, and
605 conditions, exceptions, regulations, and criminal and other penalties for violations; and
606 (34) Code Section 51-14-3, relating to definitions.
607 PART VI
608 SECTION 6-1.
609 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 267 (SUB)
- 25 -